Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.401

Funds collected—Where deposited.

All assessments, fines, and other funds collected or received under this chapter must be deposited in the health professions account and used solely to administer and implement this chapter.

[ 1997 c 79 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1997 c 79: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1997." [ 1997 c 79 s 6.]